Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-116
Changes made by Laws 2015, LB605; applicability.

The changes made to the sections listed in this section by Laws 2015, LB605, shall not apply to any offense committed prior to August 30, 2015. Any such offense shall be construed and punished according to the provisions of law existing at the time the offense was committed. For purposes of this section, an offense shall be deemed to have been committed prior to August 30, 2015, if any element of the offense occurred prior to such date. The following sections are subject to this provision: Sections 9-262, 9-352, 9-434, 9-652, 23-135.01, 28-105, 28-106, 28-201, 28-204, 28-305, 28-306, 28-309, 28-310.01, 28-311, 28-311.01, 28-311.04, 28-311.08, 28-320, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-323, 28-393, 28-394, 28-397, 28-416, 28-504, 28-507, 28-514, 28-518, 28-519, 28-603, 28-604, 28-611, 28-611.01, 28-620, 28-621, 28-622, 28-627, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-703, 28-707, 28-912, 28-932, 28-1005, 28-1009, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1212.03, 28-1222, 28-1224, 28-1344, 28-1345, 28-1803, 28-1804, 29-1816, 29-2204, 29-2260, 29-2308, 29-4011, 60-6,197.03, 60-6,197.06, 68-1017, 68-1017.01, 71-2228, and 71-2229.

Laws 2015, LB605, § 109;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 10.

The nonretroactive provision of section 28-105(7) applies to the changes made by 2015 Neb. Laws, L.B. 605, to penalties for Class IV felony convictions under section 29-2204.02. State v. Benavides, 294 Neb. 902, 884 N.W.2d 923 (2016).